Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 9 Establishment of Private Roads

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For casenote, “REAL PROPERTY — Wyoming's Private Road Statutes: Approaching A Dead End? Lindt v. Murray, 895 P.2d 459,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 443 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Easements and Licenses § 1 et seq.; 39 Am. Jur. 2d Highways, Streets and Bridges §§ 53, 54.

What constitutes unity of title or ownership sufficient for relation of an easement by implication or way of necessity, 94 ALR3d 502.

Construction and application of rule requiring public use for which property is condemned to be “more necessary” or “higher use” than public use to which property is already appropriated — state takings, 49 ALR5th 769.

28A C.J.S. Easements § 1 et seq.; 39A C.J.S. Highways § 1.